District of Columbia statutes.
34-1259.07

Rate and service regulation.

(a)

All proposed rates and service offerings for cable service shall be specified in an appendix to the franchise agreement.

(b)

A cable operator shall provide a notice of any planned change in rates or services to the Office at least 30 days before the change.

(c)

The Office may regulate cable services and rates in compliance with federal law and regulations; provided, that regulations promulgated by the Office to carry out this subsection shall be transmitted to the Council for a 60-day period of review.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 907
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334